Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2307
Board; removal of member; grounds.

A member of the board shall be removable by the Governor for cause. He or she shall first be given a copy of written charges against him or her and also an opportunity to be heard publicly. In addition to all other causes, a member ceasing to (1) be a resident of the state, (2) live in the district from which he or she was appointed, or (3) be actually engaged in growing wheat in the state shall be deemed sufficient cause for removal from office.

Laws 1955, c. 5, § 7, p. 61;

Laws 1981, LB 11, § 26.